Massachusetts, session 194th, S2349.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13B of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (a) the following 2
subsections:-
(a1/2) No operator of a motor vehicle shall record, broadcast, or otherwise capture
images or video of themselves. No operator shall wear, hold, or otherwise utilize or interact with
a spatial computer, or other augmented reality or mixed reality device, operating system, or
three-dimensional user interface.
(a3/4) An operator shall not view video, images or text unrelated to the operation,
maintenance, or navigation of the motor vehicle that is displayed on a monitor, screen or other
display installed in the motor vehicle or otherwise worn as a headset or elsewhere on the
of 2

operator’s body. This subsection shall not apply to: (i) symbols or text that enable or disable the
hands-free mode of either a mobile electronic device or an on-board application; (ii) symbols or
text related to the use of audio systems; (iii) symbols or text related to the use of equipment
installed in the motor vehicle by the manufacturer; (iv) symbols or text related to the use of a
dispatch system; (v) video or images of vehicle occupants other than the operator; or (vi) video,
images, symbols or text related to the use of traffic engineering equipment.
SECTION 2. Said section 13B of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 24, the words “using a mobile electronic device”.
SECTION 3. Subsection (d) of said section 13B of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the third sentence the following sentence:-
The provisions of subsections (a1/2) and (a3/4) of this section shall be enforced by law
enforcement agencies only when an operator of a motor vehicle has been stopped for a violation
of the motor vehicle laws or some other offense.
of 2